Mississippi, session 2026, HB559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 65-9-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-9-7.  The Division of State Aid Road Construction of the Mississippi State Highway Department, is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase, own and operate * * *seven (7) the necessary number of passenger automobiles deemed appropriate to carry out the functions of the division, * * *the same to be purchased, owned, and operated in strict accordance with the provisions of Sections 25-1-77 through 25-1-93 * * *, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.